src/morphology/inflection/codifieds.lexc
LEXICON CodifiedAcroStem/Y
	CodifiedAcroStem/Common	;
[NUM=SG][CASE=NOM]:%:	Possessive/Obligatory+Vn	;
[NUM=SG][CASE=NOM]:%:	Clitic/Obligatory	;
[NUM=PL][CASE=NOM]:%:t	Clitic/Optional	;
[NUM=SG][CASE=NOM]:%:n	Clitic/Optional	;
[NUM=SG][CASE=PAR]:%:tä	Possessive/Optional+Vn	;
[NUM=SG][CASE=ILL]:%:hin	Possessive/Optional	;
[NUM=SG][CASE=ABE]:%:ttä	Possessive/Optional+Vn	;
[NUM=SG][CASE=ABL]:%:ltä	Possessive/Optional+Vn	;
[NUM=SG][CASE=ADE]:%:llä	Possessive/Optional+Vn	;
[NUM=SG][CASE=ALL]:%:lle	Possessive/Optional+Vn	;
[NUM=SG][CASE=ELA]:%:stä	Possessive/Optional+Vn	;
[NUM=SG][CASE=ESS]:%:nä	Possessive/Optional+Vn	;
[NUM=SG][CASE=INE]:%:ssä	Possessive/Optional+Vn	;
[NUM=SG][CASE=TRA]:%:ksi	Clitic/Optional	;
[NUM=SG][CASE=TRA]:%:kse	Possessive/Obligatory+Vn	;
[NUM=PL][CASE=PAR]:%:itä	Possessive/Optional+Vn	;
[NUM=PL][CASE=ILL]:%:ihin	Possessive/Optional	;
[NUM=PL][CASE=ABE]:%:ittä	Possessive/Optional+Vn	;
[NUM=PL][CASE=ABL]:%:iltä	Possessive/Optional+Vn	;
[NUM=PL][CASE=ADE]:%:illä	Possessive/Optional+Vn	;
[NUM=PL][CASE=ALL]:%:ille	Possessive/Optional+Vn	;
[NUM=PL][CASE=ESS]:%:inä	Possessive/Optional+Vn	;
[CASE=CMT]:%:ine	Possessive/Optional+Vn	;
[NUM=PL][CASE=ELA]:%:istä	Possessive/Optional+Vn	;
[NUM=PL][CASE=INE]:%:issä	Possessive/Optional+Vn	;
[NUM=PL][CASE=INS]:%:in	Clitic/Optional	;
[NUM=PL][CASE=TRA]:%:iksi	Clitic/Optional	;
[NUM=PL][CASE=TRA]:%:ikse	Possessive/Obligatory+Vn	;

LEXICON CodifiedAcroStem/ž
    CodifiedAcroStem/Z   ;

LEXICON CodifiedAcroStem/Ž
    CodifiedAcroStem/Z   ;

LEXICON CodifiedAcroStem/z
    CodifiedAcroStem/Z   ;

LEXICON CodifiedAcroStem/Z
	CodifiedAcroStem/Common	;
[NUM=SG][CASE=NOM]:%:	Possessive/Obligatory+Vn	;
[NUM=SG][CASE=NOM]:%:	Clitic/Obligatory	;
[NUM=PL][CASE=NOM]:%:t	Clitic/Optional	;
[NUM=SG][CASE=NOM]:%:n	Clitic/Optional	;
[NUM=SG][CASE=PAR]:%:aa	Possessive/Optional+Vn	;
[NUM=SG][CASE=ILL]:%:aan	Possessive/Optional	;
[NUM=SG][CASE=ABE]:%:tta	Possessive/Optional+Vn	;
[NUM=SG][CASE=ABL]:%:lta	Possessive/Optional+Vn	;
[NUM=SG][CASE=ADE]:%:lla	Possessive/Optional+Vn	;
[NUM=SG][CASE=ALL]:%:lle	Possessive/Optional+Vn	;
[NUM=SG][CASE=ELA]:%:sta	Possessive/Optional+Vn	;
[NUM=SG][CASE=ESS]:%:na	Possessive/Optional+Vn	;
[NUM=SG][CASE=INE]:%:ssa	Possessive/Optional+Vn	;
[NUM=SG][CASE=TRA]:%:ksi	Clitic/Optional	;
[NUM=SG][CASE=TRA]:%:kse	Possessive/Obligatory+Vn	;
[NUM=PL][CASE=PAR]:%:ja	Possessive/Optional+Vn	;
[NUM=PL][CASE=ILL]:%:ihin	Possessive/Optional	;
[NUM=PL][CASE=ABE]:%:itta	Possessive/Optional+Vn	;
[NUM=PL][CASE=ABL]:%:ilta	Possessive/Optional+Vn	;
[NUM=PL][CASE=ADE]:%:illa	Possessive/Optional+Vn	;
[NUM=PL][CASE=ALL]:%:ille	Possessive/Optional+Vn	;
[NUM=PL][CASE=ESS]:%:ina	Possessive/Optional+Vn	;
[CASE=CMT]:%:ine	Possessive/Optional+Vn	;
[NUM=PL][CASE=ELA]:%:ista	Possessive/Optional+Vn	;
[NUM=PL][CASE=INE]:%:issa	Possessive/Optional+Vn	;
[NUM=PL][CASE=INS]:%:in	Clitic/Optional	;
[NUM=PL][CASE=TRA]:%:iksi	Clitic/Optional	;
[NUM=PL][CASE=TRA]:%:ikse	Possessive/Obligatory+Vn	;

LEXICON CodifiedAcroStem/ä
	CodifiedAcroStem/Ä	;

LEXICON CodifiedAcroStem/Ä
	CodifiedAcroStem/Common	;
[NUM=SG][CASE=NOM]:%:	Possessive/Obligatory+Vn	;
[NUM=SG][CASE=NOM]:%:	Clitic/Obligatory	;
[NUM=PL][CASE=NOM]:%:t	Clitic/Optional	;
[NUM=SG][CASE=NOM]:%:n	Clitic/Optional	;
[NUM=SG][CASE=PAR]:%:tä	Possessive/Optional+Vn	;
[NUM=SG][CASE=ILL]:%:hän	Possessive/Optional	;
[NUM=SG][CASE=ABE]:%:ttä	Possessive/Optional+Vn	;
[NUM=SG][CASE=ABL]:%:ltä	Possessive/Optional+Vn	;
[NUM=SG][CASE=ADE]:%:llä	Possessive/Optional+Vn	;
[NUM=SG][CASE=ALL]:%:lle	Possessive/Optional+Vn	;
[NUM=SG][CASE=ELA]:%:stä	Possessive/Optional+Vn	;
[NUM=SG][CASE=ESS]:%:nä	Possessive/Optional+Vn	;
[NUM=SG][CASE=INE]:%:ssä	Possessive/Optional+Vn	;
[NUM=SG][CASE=TRA]:%:ksi	Clitic/Optional	;
[NUM=SG][CASE=TRA]:%:kse	Possessive/Obligatory+Vn	;
[NUM=PL][CASE=PAR]:%:itä	Possessive/Optional+Vn	;
[NUM=PL][CASE=ILL]:%:ihin	Possessive/Optional	;
[NUM=PL][CASE=ABE]:%:ittä	Possessive/Optional+Vn	;
[NUM=PL][CASE=ABL]:%:iltä	Possessive/Optional+Vn	;
[NUM=PL][CASE=ADE]:%:illä	Possessive/Optional+Vn	;
[NUM=PL][CASE=ALL]:%:ille	Possessive/Optional+Vn	;
[NUM=PL][CASE=ESS]:%:inä	Possessive/Optional+Vn	;
[CASE=CMT]:%:ine	Possessive/Optional+Vn	;
[NUM=PL][CASE=ELA]:%:istä	Possessive/Optional+Vn	;
[NUM=PL][CASE=INE]:%:issä	Possessive/Optional+Vn	;
[NUM=PL][CASE=INS]:%:in	Clitic/Optional	;
[NUM=PL][CASE=TRA]:%:iksi	Clitic/Optional	;
[NUM=PL][CASE=TRA]:%:ikse	Possessive/Obligatory+Vn	;

LEXICON CodifiedAcroStem/ö
	CodifiedAcroStem/Ö	;

LEXICON CodifiedAcroStem/Ö
	CodifiedAcroStem/Common	;
[NUM=SG][CASE=NOM]:%:	Possessive/Obligatory+Vn	;
[NUM=SG][CASE=NOM]:%:	Clitic/Obligatory	;
[NUM=PL][CASE=NOM]:%:t	Clitic/Optional	;
[NUM=SG][CASE=NOM]:%:n	Clitic/Optional	;
[NUM=SG][CASE=PAR]:%:tä	Possessive/Optional+Vn	;
[NUM=SG][CASE=ILL]:%:hön	Possessive/Optional	;
[NUM=SG][CASE=ABE]:%:ttä	Possessive/Optional+Vn	;
[NUM=SG][CASE=ABL]:%:ltä	Possessive/Optional+Vn	;
[NUM=SG][CASE=ADE]:%:llä	Possessive/Optional+Vn	;
[NUM=SG][CASE=ALL]:%:lle	Possessive/Optional+Vn	;
[NUM=SG][CASE=ELA]:%:stä	Possessive/Optional+Vn	;
[NUM=SG][CASE=ESS]:%:nä	Possessive/Optional+Vn	;
[NUM=SG][CASE=INE]:%:ssä	Possessive/Optional+Vn	;
[NUM=SG][CASE=TRA]:%:ksi	Clitic/Optional	;
[NUM=SG][CASE=TRA]:%:kse	Possessive/Obligatory+Vn	;
[NUM=PL][CASE=PAR]:%:itä	Possessive/Optional+Vn	;
[NUM=PL][CASE=ILL]:%:ihin	Possessive/Optional	;
[NUM=PL][CASE=ABE]:%:ittä	Possessive/Optional+Vn	;
[NUM=PL][CASE=ABL]:%:iltä	Possessive/Optional+Vn	;
[NUM=PL][CASE=ADE]:%:illä	Possessive/Optional+Vn	;
[NUM=PL][CASE=ALL]:%:ille	Possessive/Optional+Vn	;
[NUM=PL][CASE=ESS]:%:inä	Possessive/Optional+Vn	;
[CASE=CMT]:%:ine	Possessive/Optional+Vn	;
[NUM=PL][CASE=ELA]:%:istä	Possessive/Optional+Vn	;
[NUM=PL][CASE=INE]:%:issä	Possessive/Optional+Vn	;
[NUM=PL][CASE=INS]:%:in	Clitic/Optional	;
[NUM=PL][CASE=TRA]:%:iksi	Clitic/Optional	;
[NUM=PL][CASE=TRA]:%:ikse	Possessive/Obligatory+Vn	;

LEXICON CodifiedAbbreviation
    Compounding/Dashed ;
